el: Ποικιλία γογγυλοκράμβης (Kohlrabi): Πρώιμο μωβ Βιέννης; Πρώιμο λευκό Βιέννης; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Μωβ Βιέννης; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Λευκό Βιέννης; Άλλο
fr: Variété de chou-rave: Violet hâtif de Vienne; Blanc hâtif de Vienne; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Violet de Vienne; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Blanc de Vienne; Autre
sk-SK: Odroda kalerábu: Skorý fialový viedenský; Skorý biely viedenský; Gigant; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Fialový viedenský; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Biely viedenský; Iné
da: Kålrabi-sort: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Anden
ru: Сорт кольраби: Ранняя фиолетовая венская; Ранняя белая венская; Гигант; Гранд Дьюк; Колибри; Коссак; Фиолетовая венская; Квикстар; Супершмельц; Белая венская; Другое
tr: Alabaş çeşidi: Erken Mor Viyana; Erken Beyaz Viyana; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Mor Viyana; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Beyaz Viyana; Diğer
bg-BG: Сорт алабаш: Ранна лилава Виена; Ранна бяла Виена; Гигант; Гранд Дюк; Колибри; Косак; Лилава Виена; Куикстар; Супершмелц; Бяла Виена; Друго
nb: Kålrabisort: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Annet
cs: Odrůda kedlubnu: Raná purpurová vídeňská; Raná bílá vídeňská; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purpurová vídeňská; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Bílá vídeňská; Ostatní
pt-PT: Variedade de couve-rábano: Roxa de Viena precoce; Branca de Viena precoce; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Roxa de Viena; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Branca de Viena; Outro
es: Variedad de colinabo: Morado temprano de Viena; Blanco temprano de Viena; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Morado de Viena; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Blanco de Viena; Otra
lt-LT: Kaliaropių rūšis: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Kita
sl-SI: Sorta kolerabice: Zgodnja dunajska modra; Zgodnja dunajska bela; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Dunajska modra; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Dunajska bela; Drugo
zh-TW: 球莖甘藍品種: 早生紫維也納; 早生白維也納; 吉甘特; 大公; 科利布里; 科薩克; 紫維也納; 快星; 超級施梅爾茨; 白維也納; 其他
ko: 콜라비 품종: 얼리 퍼플 비엔나; 얼리 화이트 비엔나; 기간테; 그랜드 듀크; 콜리브리; 코삭; 퍼플 비엔나; 퀵스타; 슈퍼스멜츠; 화이트 비엔나; 기타
sv: Kålrabbisort: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Övrigt
de: Kohlrabisorte: Früher Lila Wiener; Früher Weißer Wiener; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Lila Wiener; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Weißer Wiener; Andere
ro-RO: Varietatea de gulie: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Altele
zh-CN: 苤蓝品种: 维也纳早紫; 维也纳早白; 巨型; 大公; 蜂鸟; 哥萨克; 维也纳紫; 快星; 超级斯梅尔茨; 维也纳白; 其他
hu: Karalábéfajta: Korai lila bécsi; Korai fehér bécsi; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Lila bécsi; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Fehér bécsi; Egyéb
hr-HR: Sorta koraba: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Ostalo
pl: Odmiana kalarepy: Wiedeńska wczesna fioletowa; Wiedeńska wczesna biała; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Wiedeńska fioletowa; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Wiedeńska biała; Inna
nl: Koolrabi variëteit: Vroege Paarse Wener; Vroege Witte Wener; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Paarse Wener; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Witte Wener; Overig
ja: コールラビの種類: アーリー・パープル・ビエナ; アーリー・ホワイト・ビエナ; ギガンテ; グランド・デューク; コリブリ; コサック; パープル・ビエナ; クイックスター; スーパーシュメルツ; ホワイト・ビエナ; その他
th: โคลราบีหลากหลายชนิด: เออร์ลีเพอร์เพิลเวียนนา; เออร์ลีไวท์เวียนนา; จิแกนเต้; แกรนด์ดยุก; โคลิบริ; คอสแซค; เพอร์เพิลเวียนนา; ควิกสตาร์; ซูเปอร์ชเมลซ์; ไวท์เวียนนา; อื่นๆ
fi: Kyssäkaalin lajike: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Muu
it: Varietà di cavolo rapa: Vienna viola precoce; Vienna bianco precoce; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Vienna viola; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Vienna bianco; Altro
en: Kohlrabi variety: Early Purple Vienna; Early White Vienna; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Purple Vienna; Quickstar; Superschmelz; White Vienna; Other
vi: Giống củ cải Kohlrabi: Vienna tím sớm; Vienna trắng sớm; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Vienna tím; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Vienna trắng; Khác
pt-BR: Couve-rábano variedade: Viena roxa precoce; Viena branca precoce; Gigante; Grand Duke; Kolibri; Kossak; Viena roxa; Quickstar; Superschmelz; Viena branca; Outro